Massachusetts, session 194th, H667.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word "week." in line 30, the following words:-
Absences may also be permitted for students participating in national or international
competition sanctioned by a U.S. national governing body as defined in 36 Unities States Code
2205, referred to as the Ted Stevens Act; provided, however, that students seeking approval shall
maintain a B grade point average or equivalent in academic courses. The school principal shall
have discretion over absences excused exceeding seven-day sessions or fourteen half day session
in a period of six months.
of 1